lexc/noun/enhuazez.lexc
!!!enhuazez.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
      
LEXICON Root
Det;

LEXICON Det
amaz AddDet;
az AddDet;
azon AddDet;
egyugyanaz AddDet;
egyugyanazon AddDet;
emez AddDet;
ez AddDet;
ezen AddDet;
mindaz AddDet;
mindez AddDet;
mindazon AddDet;
mindezen AddDet;
ugyanaz AddDet;
ugyanez AddDet;
ugyanazon AddDet;
ugyanezen AddDet;

LEXICON AddDet
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen1;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;
 

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor

LEXICON Case1
!+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
!+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
!+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
!+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
!+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
!+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
!+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
!+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
!+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
